Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF35.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1185YH (8) 91 lh/ko H.F. 35 Section 1. Section 139A.8B, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. a. A postsecondary school that 3 offers a degree program that requires completion of a clinical 4 rotation shall, upon request of a student enrolled in the 5 degree program, identify a clinical rotation placement at which 6 the student will be permitted an exemption from any COVID-19 7 vaccination requirement imposed by the placement location 8 during the duration of the studentâs clinical rotation. 9 b. Notwithstanding section 256.183, a postsecondary school 10 that fails to comply with paragraph âaâ shall not qualify as an 11 eligible institution for the purpose of the Iowa tuition grant 12 program under section 256.191. 13 Sec. 2. Section 139A.8B, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 14 by adding the following new paragraph: 15 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0a. âClinical rotationâ means the education 16 and experiences a health care student receives while observing 17 and working with a qualified health care professional of a 18 specific profession or specialty for the purpose of completing 19 a degree program. 20